Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-806
Calculation of allowable growth under Nebraska Budget Act.

For purposes of calculating allowable growth under the Nebraska Budget Act, the following shall be treated as an annexation of territory by a regional metropolitan transit authority:

(1) If the municipality that established the transit authority prior to the conversion of such authority into a regional metropolitan transit authority annexes additional territory after such conversion; or

(2) If any other municipality which joined such regional metropolitan transit authority pursuant to subsection (2) of section 18-804 annexes additional territory after joining such regional metropolitan transit authority.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 6.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.